apertium-cv-tt.tt.twol
Alphabet

 А Ә Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж Җ З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  
 а ә б в г д е ё ж җ з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 

 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а

 %{L%}:л %{G%}:г %{D%}:д %{K%}:к

 %{s%}:с %{j%}:0 %{w%}:0 %{n%}:0 %{l%}:л

 %>:0 %  ; 

Sets

BackVow    =  А О Ы У Я Ю
              а о ы у я ю ;


FrontVow   =  Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
              ә е э и ө ү; 

Vow       = А О Ы У Я Ю Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
            а о ы у я ю ә е э и ө ү;

Cns       =  Б В Г Д Ж Җ З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
             б в г д ж җ з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ь % ; 

NasalCns  =  М Н Ң
             м н ң ; 

VoicedCns =  Б Д Г В З Ж С 
             б д г в з ж с ;             

CnsVoiceless = К П Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
               к п т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ь  ;

Rules 

"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
           except
!                 :FrontVow :л %>: :л _ р ;   ! WTF is this for?
!                                      _ %>: %{E%}:и ;
!                                      _ %>: %{E%}:й ;
												  _ %>: %{E%}: ;

"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"Plural alternation after nasal"
%{L%}:н <=> :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: р ; 

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | %{j%}:0 | %{w%}:0 ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;


"Intervocalic voicing of к/п"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          where Cx in ( п к )
                Cy in ( б г )
                matched;

"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
                       [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                                      ә: %>: _ ;
!                               :FrontVow %>: _ ;
                         %{A%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                              FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;


"Turn {E} into й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
!                           ә: %>: _ ;
!             %{A%}:ә/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!             %{A%}:0/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
     [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  
                    :FrontVow %>: _ ;
                    FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;

"Turn {E} into и to combine with ә"
!%{E%}:и <=> ә: %>: _ ;
!            е: %>: _ ;
!        %{A%}: %>: _ ;
%{E%}:и <=> :FrontVow %>: _ ;
!               %{A%}: %>: _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  
            FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;

"Delete ә before E:и"
ә:0 <=> _ %>: %{E%}:и ;

"Delete {A} before E:и"
%{A%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{E%}:и ;
            except
            [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %>: %{E%}: ;

"Turn а to ы before E:й"
а:ы <=> _ %>: %{E%}:й ;

"Turn A to ы before E:й"
%{A%}:ы <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %>: %{E%}: ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

!"Back assimilation of G"
!%{G%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 | :и | :у ] _ ;
!            except
!    :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!!        :FrontCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                   :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/ or /r/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            [ р :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | %  ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{G%} %{D%} )
                Cy in (   к     т   )
                matched;
